Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB817.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 333(j) of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 333. Public referendum requirements for increasing certain taxes.* * *(j) Department approval.--* * *(3.1) The department may not approve a school district's 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 request under this subsection if the school district was granted an exception under subsection (f) for the preceding two fiscal years.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0817PN0847 - 2 - 12345